Utah statutes.
54-1-2.   Powers and duties.

The Public Service Commission shall succeed to all powers and discharge all duties and perform all the functions which by existing and continuing law are conferred upon and required to be discharged or performed by the Public Utilities Commission of Utah.  Whenever any existing and continuing law refers to or names the Public Utilities Commission of Utah or any officer, agent, or employee of such commission, the same shall be construed to mean, refer to, and name the Public Service Commission of Utah or the corresponding officer, agent, or employee of such Public Service Commission; provided, however, that the Department of Transportation shall have jurisdiction over those safety functions transferred to it by the Department of Transportation Act.

